Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4711
Principles of law and equity.

The principles of law and equity supplement the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act except to the extent inconsistent with the act.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 11.